Hawaii statutes.
[N.] Hawaii Natural Energy Institute

[§304A-1891] Hawaii natural energy
institute; structure; function. (a) There is established the Hawaii natural energy institute at the University of Hawaii. The institute shall be
administered by a director to be appointed by the board of regents upon
recommendation by the president. The director of the institute shall appoint
the professional members of the staff and other employees. The president and
board of regents shall have the same powers over the institute and its staff as
over the university and its facilities.

(b) The director of the institute shall
coordinate the institute's work with the energy resources coordinator in
carrying out duties pursuant to section 196-4 in the area of research and
development of renewable energy sources.

(c) The institute shall:

(1) Develop renewable sources of energy for power
generation and transportation fuels by working in coordination with state
agencies, federal agencies, and private entities;

(2) Conduct research and development of renewable
sources of energy;

(3) Demonstrate and deploy efficient energy end-use
technologies, including those that address peak electric demand issues;

(4) Aggressively seek matching funding from federal
agencies and private entities for its research and development and
demonstration activities; and

(5) Report annually to the legislature, no later than
twenty days prior to the convening of each regular session, on its activities,
expenditures, contracts developed, advances in technology, its work in
coordination with state agencies and programs, and recommendations for proposed
legislation. [L 2007, c 253, pt of §2]

Previous
Vol05_Ch0261-0319
Next